test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VLONG_makomii_gt-norm.yaml
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: makomiienhimiwaaiban
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: makomiienhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: makomiienhiminiiban
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: makomiienhimini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 7
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: makomiiensiminaanan
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: makomiiensiminaanag
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: makomiiensiminaaning
     makomii+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Obv: makomiiensimiwaaan
     makomii+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pl: makomiiensimiwaaag
     makomii+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Loc: makomiiensimiwaaing
     makomii+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Obv: makomiiensiminian
     makomii+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pl: makomiiensiminiag
     makomii+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Loc: makomiiensiminiing
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: makomiienhiminaanan
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: makomiienhiminaanag
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: makomiienhiminaaning
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosPl+Obv: makomiienhimiwaaan
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pl: makomiienhimiwaaag
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosPl+Loc: makomiienhimiwaaing
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosObv+Obv: makomiienhiminian
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pl: makomiienhiminiag
     makomii+Con+Pos+PosObv+Loc: makomiienhiminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 6, 7
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: makomiiensimibanan
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: makomiiensimibanag
     makomii+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: makomiiensimibaning
     makomii+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Obv: makomiiensim***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Pl: makomiiensim***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Loc: makomiiensim***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: makomiienhimibanan
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: makomiienhimibanag
     makomii+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: makomiienhimibaning
     makomii+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: makomiienhim***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: makomiienhim***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: makomiienhim***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     makomii+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: makomiiensishinaaniban
     makomii+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: makomiiensishinaan***idig, idog***
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: makomiiensishiwaaiban
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: makomiiensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: makomiiensishiniiban
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: makomiiensishini***idig, idog***
     makomii+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: makomiienhishinaaniban
     makomii+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: makomiienhishinaan***idig, idog***
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: makomiienhishiwaaiban
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: makomiienhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: makomiienhishiniiban
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: makomiienhishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     makomii+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: makomiiensishinaanan
     makomii+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: makomiiensishinaanag
     makomii+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: makomiiensishinaaning
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: makomiiensishiwaaan
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: makomiiensishiwaaag
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: makomiiensishiwaaing
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: makomiiensishinian
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: makomiiensishiniag
     makomii+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: makomiiensishiniing
     makomii+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: makomiienhishinaanan
     makomii+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: makomiienhishinaanag
     makomii+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: makomiienhishinaaning
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: makomiienhishiwaaan
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: makomiienhishiwaaag
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: makomiienhishiwaaing
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: makomiienhishinian
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: makomiienhishiniag
     makomii+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: makomiienhishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     makomii+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: makomiiensishibanan
     makomii+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: makomiiensishibanag
     makomii+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: makomiiensishibaning
     makomii+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: makomiiensish***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: makomiiensish***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: makomiiensish***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: makomiienhishibanan
     makomii+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: makomiienhishibanag
     makomii+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: makomiienhishibaning
     makomii+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: makomiienhish***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: makomiienhish***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: makomiienhish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     makomii+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: makomiiensinaanibanan
     makomii+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: makomiiensinaanibanag
     makomii+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: makomiiensinaanibaning
     makomii+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: makomiiensinaan***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: makomiiensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: makomiiensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: makomiiensiwaaibanan
     makomii+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: makomiiensiwaaibanag
     makomii+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: makomiiensiwaaibaning
     makomii+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: makomiiensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: makomiiensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: makomiiensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: makomiiensiniibanan
     makomii+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: makomiiensiniibanag
     makomii+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: makomiiensiniibaning
     makomii+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: makomiiensini***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: makomiiensini***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: makomiiensini***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: makomiienhinaanibanan
     makomii+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: makomiienhinaanibanag
     makomii+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: makomiienhinaanibaning
     makomii+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: makomiienhinaan***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: makomiienhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: makomiienhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: makomiienhiwaaibanan
     makomii+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: makomiienhiwaaibanag
     makomii+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: makomiienhiwaaibaning
     makomii+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: makomiienhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: makomiienhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: makomiienhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: makomiienhiniibanan
     makomii+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: makomiienhiniibanag
     makomii+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: makomiienhiniibaning
     makomii+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: makomiienhini***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: makomiienhini***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: makomiienhini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     makomii+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: makomiiimishinaaniban
     makomii+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: makomiiimishinaan***idig, idog***
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: makomiiimishiwaaiban
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: makomiiimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: makomiiimishiniiban
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: makomiiimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     makomii+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: makomiiimishinaanan
     makomii+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: makomiiimishinaanag
     makomii+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: makomiiimishinaaning
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: makomiiimishiwaaan
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: makomiiimishiwaaag
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: makomiiimishiwaaing
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: makomiiimishinian
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: makomiiimishiniag
     makomii+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: makomiiimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 6, 7
     makomii+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: makomiiimishibanan
     makomii+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: makomiiimishibanag
     makomii+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: makomiiimishibaning
     makomii+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: makomiiimish***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: makomiiimish***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: makomiiimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5, 6, 7
     makomii+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: makomiiiminaanibanan
     makomii+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: makomiiiminaanibanag
     makomii+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: makomiiiminaanibaning
     makomii+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: makomiiiminaan***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: makomiiiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: makomiiiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: makomiiimiwaaibanan
     makomii+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: makomiiimiwaaibanag
     makomii+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: makomiiimiwaaibaning
     makomii+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: makomiiimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: makomiiimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: makomiiimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: makomiiiminiibanan
     makomii+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: makomiiiminiibanag
     makomii+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: makomiiiminiibaning
     makomii+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: makomiiimini***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: makomiiimini***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: makomiiimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5, 6, 7
     makomii+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: makomiiishinaanibanan
     makomii+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: makomiiishinaanibanag
     makomii+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: makomiiishinaanibaning
     makomii+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: makomiiishinaan***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: makomiiishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: makomiiishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: makomiiishiwaaibanan
     makomii+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: makomiiishiwaaibanag
     makomii+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: makomiiishiwaaibaning
     makomii+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: makomiiishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: makomiiishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: makomiiishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     makomii+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: makomiiishiniibanan
     makomii+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: makomiiishiniibanag
     makomii+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: makomiiishiniibaning
     makomii+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: makomiiishini***idig, idog***an
     makomii+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: makomiiishini***idig, idog***ag
     makomii+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: makomiiishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     +Px1makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: nimakomiiensimishinaan
     +Px1makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: nimakomiiensimishiwaa
     +Px1makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: nimakomiiensimishini
     +Px1makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: nimakomiienhimishinaan
     +Px1makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: nimakomiienhimishiwaa
     +Px1makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: nimakomiienhimishini
     +Px2makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: gimakomiiensimishinaan
     +Px2makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: gimakomiiensimishiwaa
     +Px2makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: gimakomiiensimishini
     +Px2makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: gimakomiienhimishinaan
     +Px2makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: gimakomiienhimishiwaa
     +Px2makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: gimakomiienhimishini
     +Px3makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: omakomiiensimishinaan
     +Px3makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: omakomiiensimishiwaa
     +Px3makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: omakomiiensimishini
     +Px3makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: omakomiienhimishinaan
     +Px3makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: omakomiienhimishiwaa
     +Px3makomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: omakomiienhimishini
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: imakomiiensimishinaan
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: imakomiiensimishiwaa
     +PxIndefmakomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: imakomiiensimishini
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: imakomiienhimishinaan
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: imakomiienhimishiwaa
     +PxIndefmakomii+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: imakomiienhimishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     +Px1makomii+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: nimakomiiensimishiban
